Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB768.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 321 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 321. Compensation; Oath of Office.--[All persons elected or appointed as school directors shall serve without pay except as hereinafter provided.] (a) A person elected or appointed as a school director may receive compensation for service on behalf of a school district in accordance with this section.(b) A board of school directors may, by a board resolution at a regularly scheduled meeting, authorize compensation for persons elected or appointed as school directors.1234567891011121314151617181920 (c) Compensation approved by a board of school directors under this section shall be consistent with the compensation limits for individuals elected to serve in the municipality in which the school district is located, including a member of a local municipal board or a local council member. If the school district is located in more than one municipality, the compensation approved by the board of school directors shall be consistent with the median compensation limits for individuals elected to serve in each of the municipalities in which the school district is located.(d) Before entering upon the duties of [their] office, each school director shall take and subscribe to the following oath or affirmation, which may be administered by any one qualified to administer an oath, or as hereinafter provided:--I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support, obey and defend the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of this Commonwealth, and that I will discharge the duties of my office with fidelity.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0768PN0792 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819